Mississippi, session 2026, SB3230.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The Board of Commissioners of Greenwood Leflore Hospital, a public community hospital located in Leflore County, Mississippi, and created by the Board of Supervisors of Leflore County, Mississippi, and the City of Greenwood, Mississippi, by virtue of the authority granted under Chapter 13 , Title 41, Mississippi Code of 1972, is authorized, in its discretion, to petition for relief from debts and financial obligations of the hospital under Chapter 9 of Title 11, United States Code, and to take any actions that the board of commissioners determines may be necessary for such purposes. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.